Massachusetts, session 194th, S2391.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the highway
division of the Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall, within 90 days of the passage
of this act, convene a working group of appropriate departmental staff to analyze and make
recommendations on the reopening of the tourist information center located on interstate
highway route 95 north in the town of Mansfield and converting the rest area facility to a
regional visitor information center for the purposes of promoting local and regional businesses
and tourist destinations.
SECTION 2. The working group shall study, analyze and create recommendations
regarding: (i) removal of surplus highway material, vehicles, signage and supplies impeding the
of 2

full use of the facility and parking lot; (ii) removal of roadway debris and litter on the site; (iii)
plans to redesign, rehabilitate and reconstruct the existing structure and associated funding needs
to achieve a state of good repair; (iv) safety improvements; (v) accessibility upgrades; (vi)
restroom reconstruction; (vii) a schedule of regular, routine landscaping; (viii) roadway paving;
(ix) installation of electric vehicle charging stations; (x) regular staffing of the facility; (xi)
allowable activities under 23 USC 111(a), such as commercial advertising and media displays,
items designed to promote tourism, tickets for events or attractions, travel-related information
and lottery machines; (xii) a system of measuring guests and car counts who enter and exit the
facility; (xiii) additional allowable uses, activities or stipulations; (xiv) a draft memorandum of
understanding for the purpose of contracting with the regional tourism council, chambers of
commerce or other entities to reopen the facility as a working visitor information center; and (xv)
projected costs associated with achieving a state of good repair at the facility.
SECTION 3. The working group’s findings shall be filed with the clerks of the house of
representatives and the senate not later than June 1, 2026.
of 2